it: Tipo di avvolgimento: Flatwound; Mezza tonda (groundwound); Mezza liscia (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Altro
pl: Typ owijki: Owijka płaska; Owijka półokrągła (szlifowana); Owijka w połowie okrągła (szlifowana); Owijka kompresowana; Owijka okrągła; Owijka z taśmy; Inna
ko: 권선 유형: 플랫 와운드; 하프 라운드(그라운드 와운드); 하프 와운드(그라운드 와운드); 프레셔 와운드; 라운드 와운드; 테이프 와운드; 기타
zh-CN: 卷绕类型: 平卷; 半圆卷（研磨卷弦）; 半卷（研磨卷弦）; 压卷; 圆卷; 扁平尼龙卷弦; 其他
zh-TW: 纏繞類型: 平捲; 半圓 (研磨纏繞); 半捲 (研磨纏繞); 壓捲; 圓捲; 尼龍膠帶纏繞; 其他
sk-SK: Typ vinutia: Plochý ovin; Polguľatý ovin; Polovičný ovin; Tlakový ovin; Guľatý ovin; Páskový ovin; Iné
hu: Tekercselés típusa: Lapos tekercselésű (flatwound); Félkerek (groundwound); Félkerek (groundwound); Nyomással tekercselt (pressurewound); Kerek tekercselésű (roundwound); Szalaggal tekercselt (tapewound); Egyéb
fr: Type d’enroulement: Filé plat; Demi-rond (rectifié); Demi-filé (rectifié); Filé sous pression; Filé rond; Filé nylon; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de înfășurare: Flatwound (filare plată); Semirotundă (groundwound); Semi-filare (groundwound); Filare sub presiune (pressurewound); Filare rotundă (roundwound); Filare cu bandă (tapewound); Altele
el: Τύπος περιέλιξης: Πλακέ περιέλιξη; Ημιστρόγγυλη (groundwound); Ημιπεριέλιξη (groundwound); Pressurewound; Στρόγγυλη περιέλιξη; Tapewound; Άλλο
pt-BR: Enrolamento tipo: Flatwound; Half-round (groundwound); Halfwound (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Outro
nl: Type opwinding: Flatwound; Halfround (groundwound); Halfwound (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Overige
ru: Тип намотки: Плоская обмотка; Полукруглая (шлифованная) обмотка; Полуобмотка (шлифованная); Прессованная обмотка; Круглая обмотка; Ленточная обмотка; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta namotavanja: Ravno namotano; Poluokruglo (groundwound); Polunamotano (groundwound); Tlačno namotano; Okruglo namotano; Tračno namotano; Ostalo
en: Winding type: Flatwound; Half-round (groundwound); Halfwound (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Other
sv: Lindningstyp: Flatwound; Halvrunda (groundwound); Halvslipade (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Övrigt
da: Beviklingstype: Fladspunden; Halvrund (groundwound); Halvspunden (groundwound); Pressurewound; Rundspunden; Båndspunden; Andet
de: Wicklungsart: Flatwound; Half-Round (Groundwound); Halfwound (Groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Sonstige
es: Tipo de rotación: Entorchado plano; Semicircular (entorchado rectificado); Medio entorchado (entorchado rectificado); Entorchado a presión; Entorchado redondo; Entorchado de cinta; Otro
cs: Typ vinutí: S plochým vinutím; Polokulaté (zbroušené vinutí); Poloploché (zbroušené vinutí); S tlakovým vinutím; S kulatým vinutím; S páskovým vinutím; Jiné
lt-LT: Apvijos tipas: Plokščios apvijos; Pusiau apvalios apvijos (šlifuotos); Pusinės apvijos (šlifuotos); Presuotos apvijos; Apvalios apvijos; Juostinės apvijos; Kita
fi: Punostyyppi: Litteä käämitys; Puolipyöreä (hiottu); Puolikäämitty (hiottu); Puristuskäämitty; Pyöreä käämitys; Teippikäämitty; Muu
th: ประเภทขดลวด: แฟลตวาวด์; ฮาล์ฟราวด์ (กราวด์วาวด์); ฮาล์ฟวาวด์ (กราวด์วาวด์); เพรสเชอร์วาวด์; ราวด์วาวด์; เทปวาวด์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de enrolamento: Enrolamento plano; Meio redondo (groundwound); Meio enrolamento (groundwound); Enrolamento sob pressão; Enrolamento redondo; Enrolamento em fita; Outro
ja: 巻線タイプ: フラットワウンド; ハーフラウンド (グラウンドワウンド); ハーフワウンド (グラウンドワウンド); プレッシャーワウンド; ラウンドワウンド; テープワウンド; その他
vi: Loại cuộn dây: Dây dẹt; Bán nguyệt (groundwound); Quấn nửa (groundwound); Dây ép; Dây tròn; Dây băng; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta navijanja: Flatwound; Half-round (groundwound); Halfwound (groundwound); Pressurewound; Roundwound; Tapewound; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип навиване: Плоска намотка; Полукръгла намотка (Groundwound); Полуплоска намотка (Groundwound); Пресована намотка; Кръгла намотка; Лентова намотка; Друго
nb: Viklingstype: Flatspunnet; Halvrund (slipt); Halvspunnet (slipt); Trykkspunnet; Rundspunnet; Tape-spunnet; Annet
tr: Sarma tipi: Yassı sarım; Yarım yuvarlak (zımparalanmış sarım); Yarım sarım (zımparalanmış sarım); Basınçlı sarım; Yuvarlak sarım; Bant sarım; Diğer